Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-2614.01
Protected consumer provisions; applicability.

Sections 8-2603.01, 8-2608.01, 8-2608.02, 8-2608.03, and 8-2609.01 shall not apply to any person or entity that maintains a database used solely for the following:

(1) Criminal record information;

(2) Personal loss history information;

(3) Fraud prevention or detection;

(4) Employment screening; or

(5) Tenant screening.

Laws 2016, LB835, § 19.